Utah statutes.
54-8-29.   Jurisdiction over public utilities.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall vest any jurisdiction over public utilities in the governing bodies. The Public Service Commission of Utah shall retain all jurisdiction now or hereafter conferred upon it by law.

